Washington statutes.
RCW 3.58.030

Payment of salaries.

The compensation of judges, clerks, judges pro tempore, deputy clerks, and court commissioners payable by the county shall be paid monthly out of the county treasury from the same funds out of which other salaried county officers are paid.

[ 1984 c 258 s 36; 1961 c 299 s 102.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.